Massachusetts, session 194th, S1143.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 278 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 35 the
following sections:
Section 36. (a) A civil action cannot be maintained against any person, firm or
corporation, for the publication of a fair and true report of any judicial proceeding, legislative
proceeding or other official proceeding, or for any heading of the report which is a fair and
true headnote of the statement published.
(b) This section shall not apply to a libel contained in any other matter added by any
person concerned in the publication or in the report of anything said or done at the time and place
of such a proceeding which was not a part thereof.
(c) A communication made by an individual, without malice, regarding an incident of
sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination shall be deemed privileged.
of 2

(d) A prevailing defendant in any defamation action brought against such defendant for
making a communication that is privileged under subsection (a) of this section shall be entitled
to their reasonable attorney's fees and costs for successfully defending themselves in such
litigation, plus treble damages for any harm caused to them by the defamation action against
them, in addition to punitive damages available or any other relief otherwise permitted by law.
(e) This section shall only apply to an individual that has, or at any time had, a reasonable
basis to file a complaint of sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination, whether the complaint
is, or was, filed or not.
(f) The following, as used in this chapter, unless the text otherwise requires or a different
meaning is specifically required, shall mean—
"Communication," factual information related to an incident of sexual assault,
harassment, or discrimination experienced by the individual making the communication,
including, but not limited to, any of the following: i) an act of sexual assault; ii) an act of sexual
harassment; iii) an act of workplace harassment or discrimination, failure to prevent an act of
workplace harassment or discrimination, aiding, abetting, inciting, compelling, or coercing an
act of workplace harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for
reporting or opposing workplace harassment or discrimination; or iv) an act of harassment or
discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for reporting harassment or
discrimination, by the owner of a housing accommodation.
of 2